test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-eebir_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - eebir: # 2A v - k -v, b > b'b, ee > iä, i>á
    eebir+N+Sg+Nom: eebir
    eebir+N+Sg+Gen: iäbˊbár
    eebir+N+Sg+Acc: iäbˊbár
    eebir+N+Sg+Ill: iäbˊbárân
    eebir+N+Sg+Loc: iäbˊbárist
    eebir+N+Sg+Com: iäbˊbáráin
    eebir+N+Sg+Abe: iäbˊbárttáá
    eebir+N+Ess: ebirin
    eebir+N+Par: ebirid
    eebir+N+Pl+Nom: iäbˊbáreh
    eebir+N+Pl+Gen: iäbˊbárij
    eebir+N+Pl+Acc: iäbˊbárijd
    eebir+N+Pl+Ill: iäbˊbáráid
    eebir+N+Pl+Loc: iäbˊbárijn
    eebir+N+Pl+Com: iäbˊbárijguin
    eebir+N+Pl+Abe: iäbˊbárijttáá
